Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2951
Duration of marketing contract; termination.

The initial duration of a marketing contract may not exceed ten years, but the contract may be made self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding five years each. Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least ninety days before the end of the current term.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 51;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 12.